New York, session 2025-2026, A5678.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 7209 of the education law, as 2 added by chapter 987 of the laws of 1971, is amended to read as follows: 3 3. No county, city, town or village or other political subdivision of 4 this state shall engage in the construction or maintenance of any public 5 work involving engineering or land surveying for which plans, specifica- 6 tions and estimates have not been made by, and the construction and 7 maintenance supervised by, a professional engineer or land surveyor; 8 provided that this section shall not apply to the construction, improve- 9 ment or maintenance of county roads or town highways, nor to any other 10 public works wherein the contemplated expenditure for the completed 11 project does not exceed [five] fifty thousand dollars. This section 12 shall not be construed as affecting or preventing any county, city, town 13 or village or other political subdivision of this state from engaging an 14 architect licensed in this state for the preparation of plans, specifi- 15 cations and estimates for and the supervision of construction or mainte- 16 nance of public works. 17 § 2. Paragraph b of subdivision 7 of section 7209 of the education 18 law, as added by chapter 987 of the laws of 1971, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 b. To alterations to any building or structure costing [ten] fifty 21 thousand dollars or less which do not involve changes affecting the 22 structural safety or public safety thereof nor to farm buildings, 23 including barns, sheds, poultry houses and other buildings used directly EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09120-01-5 A. 5678 2 1 and solely for agricultural purposes; nor to residence buildings of 2 gross floor area of fifteen hundred square feet or less, not including 3 garages, carports, porches, cellars, or uninhabitable basements or 4 attics. 5 § 3. Subdivision 5 of section 7307 of the education law, as added by 6 chapter 987 of the laws of 1971, paragraph 1 as amended by chapter 994 7 of the laws of 1971 and paragraph 2 as amended by chapter 591 of the 8 laws of 1986, is amended to read as follows: 9 5. This article shall not apply to: [1.] a. Farm buildings, including 10 barns, sheds, poultry houses and other buildings used directly and sole- 11 ly for agricultural purposes; nor to residence buildings of gross area 12 of fifteen hundred square feet or less, not including garages, carports, 13 porches, cellars, or uninhabitable basements or attics; or 14 [2.] b. Alterations, costing ten thousand dollars or less, to any 15 building or structure within the city of New York and [twenty] fifty 16 thousand dollars or less, to any building or structure outside the city 17 of New York which do not involve changes affecting the structural safety 18 or public safety thereof. 19 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.